District of Columbia statutes.
44-151.16

Other licensing or regulation.

Nothing in this chapter affects the authority of any agency otherwise provided by law to license or regulate any health service facility, domiciliary service facility, or food service.

History

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-270, § 116, 52 DCR 799